Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB635.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7508 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7508. Drug trafficking sentencing and penalties.* * *(g) Sentencing enhancement.-- The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for courts to consider in cases involving a person violating section 13(a)(12), (14) or (30) of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act where the controlled substance or a mixture containing it is classified in <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 Schedule I, II, III or IV under section 4 of that act if the person manufactures, delivers or possesses with the intent to manufacture or deliver the controlled substance within 1,000 feet of the real property on which a drug and alcohol recovery house is located. As used in this subsection, the term "drug and alcohol recovery house" shall be as defined in section 2311-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. TITLE 42 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 9720.9. SENTENCING FOR OFFENSES COMMITTED NEAR DRUG AND ALCOHOL RECOVERY HOUSES.(A) SENTENCING ENHANCEMENT.--THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON SENTENCING, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 2154 (RELATING TO ADOPTION OF GUIDELINES FOR SENTENCING), SHALL PROVIDE FOR A SENTENCING ENHANCEMENT FOR AN OFFENSE COMMITTED UNDER SECTION 13(A)(12), (14) OR (30) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 14, 1972 (P.L.233, NO.64), KNOWN AS THE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, DRUG, DEVICE AND COSMETIC ACT, WHERE THE OFFENSE WAS COMMITTED WITHIN 1,000 FEET OF THE REAL PROPERTY ON WHICH A DRUG AND ALCOHOL RECOVERY HOUSE IS LOCATED.(B) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "DRUG AND ALCOHOL RECOVERY HOUSE" MEANS THE SAME AS DEFINED UNDER SECTION 2311-A OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250SB0635PN0863 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627